en: Without hormones, raised without hormones
bg: Без хормони, отгледано без хормони
de: ohne Hormone, Aufzucht ohne Hormone
es: Sin hormonas, criado sin hormonas, criados sin hormonas, criada sin hormonas, criadas sin hormonas
fi: hormoniton, kasvatettu ilman hormoneja
fr: Sans hormone, élevé sans hormone
it: Senza ormoni, allevato senza ormoni
pt: Sem hormonas, criado sem hormonas, criados sem hormonas, criada sem hormonas, criadas sem hormonas

en: Without antibiotics or hormones, Without hormones or antibiotics
bg: Без антибиотици или хормони
de: ohne Antibiotika oder Hormone, Aufzucht ohne Hormone oder Antibiotika
fr: Sans antibiotique ni hormone, sans antibiotiques ni hormones
it: Senza antibiotici né ormoni, senza ormoni né antibiotici
pt: Sem antibióticos ou hormonas, sem antibióticos nem hormonas

en: National standard for Bulgarian yoghurt
bg: БДС 12:2010, Национален стандарт за българско кисело мляко

en: National standard for Bulgarian kashkaval
bg: БДС 14:2010, Национален стандарт за български кашкавал

bg: Утвърден стандарт България
en: Approved standard Bulgaria
ca: Estàndard aprovat Bulgària
de: Genehmigter Standard Bulgarien
es: Estándar aprobado Bulgaria
fr: Norme approuvée Bulgarie
hu: Jóváhagyott szabvány Bulgária
it: Standard approvato Bulgaria
pt: Padrão aprovado Bulgária

bg: Утвърден стандарт Стара планина
en: Approved standard Stara Planina
fr: Norme approuvée Stara Planina

en: Quality food from hungary
fi: laaturuokaa Unkarista
hu: Kiváló Magyar Termék

en: raised in Norway
ca: Criat a Noruega
de: In Norwegen aufgewachsen
es: Criado en Noruega
fi: Kasvatettu Norjassa
fr: élevé en Norvège, élevés en Norvège, élevée en Norvège, élevées en Norvège
it: Cresciuto in Norvegia, Allevato in Norvegia
pt: Criado na Noruega, criados na Noruega, criada na Noruega, criadas na Noruega

en: raised in Scotland
de: In Schottland aufgewachsen
fi: Kasvatettu Skotlannissa
fr: élevé en Ecosse, élevés en Ecosse, élevée en Ecosse, élevées en Ecosse
it: Cresciuto in Scozia, Allevato in Scozia
pt: Criado na Escócia, criados na Escócia, criada na Escócia, criadas na Escócia

en: raised in Ireland
de: aufgezogen in Irland, aufgewachsen in Irland
fi: kasvatettu Irlannissa
fr: élevé en Irlande, élevés en Irlande, élevée en Irlande, élevées en Irlande
pt: Criado na Irlanda, criados na Irlanda, criada na Irlanda, criadas na Irlanda

en: Contains a source of phenylalanine
bg: Съдържа източник на фенилаланин
ca: Conté una font de fenilalanina
da: Indeholder en phenylalaninkilde
de: Enthält eine Phenylalaninquelle, Das produkt enthält eine Phenylalaninquelle
es: contiene una fuente de fenilalanina
fi: Sisältää fenyylialaniinin lähteen
fr: Contient une source de phénylalanine
hr: sadrži izvor fenilalanina, izvor fenilalanina
hu: fenilalanin-forrást tartalmaz
it: Contiene una fonte di fenilalanina
nb: Inneholder en fenylalaninkilde
nl: Bevat een bron van phenylalanine
pt: Contém uma fonte de fenilalanina
sv: Innehåller en fenylalaninkälla, Innehåller en källa till fenylalanin, innehåller en källa av fenylalanin

en: Excessive consumption can have laxative effects
ca: El consum excessiu pot produir efectes laxants
da: Overdreven indtagelse kan virke afførende
de: Übermäßiger Konsum kann abführend wirken
es: Un consumo excesivo puede tener efectos laxantes
fi: liiallisella kulutuksella saattaa olla laksatiivisia vaikutuksia, liiallisella käytöllä voi olla laksatiivisia vaikutuksia
fr: Une consommation excessive peut avoir des effets laxatifs
hr: prekomjerna konzumacija može imati laksativni učinak.
hu: A túlzott fogyasztása hashajtó hatású lehet
it: Un consumo eccessivo puù avere effetti lassativi
nb: Overdrevet inntak kan ha avførende virkning, Kan virke avførende ved stort inntak
pt: O consumo excessivo pode ter efeitos laxantes
sv: Överdriven konsumtion kan ha laxerande verkan

en: Cocoa Life
xx: Cocoa Life

en: Pasteurized, Pasteurised, pasteurized product
bg: Пастьоризиран продукт
ca: Producte pasteuritzat
da: pasteuriseret, pasteuriserede
de: Pasteurisiertes Produkt
es: Producto pasteurizado
fr: Pasteurisé, produit pasteurisé
hr: pasterizirano, proizvod pasteriziran
hu: pasztőrözött termék
it: Pastorizzato, pastorizzata, pastorizzate, Prodotto pastorizzato
nb: Pasteurisert
nl: gepasteuriseerd, gepasteuriseerd product
pt: Produto pasteurizado
sv: Pastöriserat, pastöriserade

en: Flash pasteurized, Flash pasteurised
fr: Flash pasteurisé
nl: Flash gepasteuriseerd

en: Unpasteurized
bg: Непастьоризирано
de: Unpasteurisiert
es: No pasteurizado
fr: Non pasteurisé
it: Non pastorizzato
nl: Ongepasteuriseerd
sv: Opastöriserat, opastöriserade

en: Cold pressed
es: Prensado en frío
fr: Pression à froid, haute pression à froid
nl: Koudgeperst
pt: Prensado a frio
sv: Kallpressad, kallpressade

en: Unfiltered, cloudy
bg: Нефилтрирано
da: Ufiltreret, ufiltrerede
de: Trüb, Naturtrüb
es: Sin filtrar, turbia
sv: Ofiltrerat, ofiltrerade

en: Filtered
bg: Филтрирано
da: Filtreret, filtrerede
de: Klar
es: Filtrada, filtrado
fr: Non filtrée, Clair
sv: Filtrerat, filtrerade

en: Rinsed and ready to eat
sv: Sköljd & färdig att äta, Sköljd och färdig att äta